Washington statutes.
RCW 15.76.160

Purposes for which allocation made—To whom made.

Any state allocations made under this chapter shall be made only as a reimbursement in whole or in part for operating expenses incurred. State allocations to fairs under the control of one or more counties must be made to the county treasurer of the county in which the fair is held. State allocations to other fairs or youth shows under RCW 15.76.120 must be made to sponsors of such fairs or shows.

[ 2018 c 280 s 7; 1961 c 61 s 7.]